Alabama, session 2026rs, SB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
12 Section 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of
13 the following:
14 (1) The Ten Commandments are a key part of the
15 Judeo-Christian religious and moral tradition that shaped
16 Western Civilization and ultimately the founding of the United
17 States. In particular, because they include what John Quincy
18 Adams described as both "civil and municipal" provisions as
19 well as "moral and religious" provisions, the Ten Commandments
20 have historical significance as one of the foundations of our
21 legal system. Teaching students about the Ten Commandments
22 promotes historical understanding and helps to foster a common
23 cultural heritage and awareness.
24 (2) Documents created to shape civil society during the
25 founding era of this nation include direct and indirect
26 references to God and religion. These documents include the
27 following:
28 a. The Mayflower Compact of 1620, America's first
Page 1

a. The Mayflower Compact of 1620, America's first
SB99 Enrolled
29 written constitution, was a covenant made among the pilgrims
30 with "Almighty God" to "form a civil body politic." The
31 Mayflower Compact was the first purely American document of
32 self-government and affirmed the link between civil society
33 and God.
34 b. The Declaration of Independence (1776) described all
35 men as being "created equal" and "endowed by their Creator
36 with certain unalienable Rights."
37 c. The United States Constitution (1787) stated in its
38 preamble that one of its purposes was to secure "the Blessings
39 of Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity" and closed with a
40 reference to the date of execution as the Seventeenth Day of
41 September in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred
42 and eighty-seven.
43 d. The Northwest Ordinance of 1787 provided a method of
44 admitting new states to the Union from territories as the
45 country expanded westward. The Northwest Ordinance "extended
46 the fundamental principles of civil and religious liberty" to
47 the territories and stated that "[r]eligion, morality, and
48 knowledge, being necessary to good government and the
49 happiness of mankind, schools and the means of education shall
50 forever be encouraged."
51 (3) References to God and religion in public documents
52 and other public contexts did not end at the founding but
53 rather have occurred throughout our nation's history without
54 any serious claim that such references violate the
55 Establishment Clause. Examples include displays associated
56 with the Ten Commandments in the Supreme Court of the United
Page 2

with the Ten Commandments in the Supreme Court of the United
SB99 Enrolled
57 States, the Library of Congress, the Ronald Reagan
58 International Trade Building, and the National Archives.
59 Public references to God have occurred repeatedly over the
60 nation's history. No outcry followed Abraham Lincoln's
61 reference to God in his Gettysburg Address in 1863. Our
62 coinage has born the phrase, "IN GOD WE TRUST," since 1865.
63 Prayers have opened our legislative sessions for hundreds of
64 years. In 1932, Congress adopted our National Anthem and
65 included in the last verse, "In God is our trust." In 1952,
66 Congress proclaimed a "National Day of Prayer." In 1954,
67 Congress added "under God" to the Pledge of Allegiance. The
68 display of the Ten Commandments as provided in this act, with
69 an appropriate context statement and integrated with the
70 approved public school social studies curriculum, is
71 consistent with these historical practices and understandings
72 and, at a minimum, furthers the same interests as the
73 interests served by these historical practices and
74 understandings.
75 (4) The 2024 social studies curriculum approved by the
76 Alabama State Board of Education (Alabama Course of Study:
77 Social Studies) provides: "Social studies education in Alabama
78 aims to prepare students to become knowledgeable, engaged, and
79 responsible citizens in society. Social studies reflects the
80 achievements, struggles, interactions, and endeavors that have
81 characterized human society as it has changed over time and
82 place to shape the world today. The disciplines of social
83 studies include, but are not limited to: Anthropology,
84 Archaeology, Civics, Economics, Geography, Government,
Page 3

Archaeology, Civics, Economics, Geography, Government,
SB99 Enrolled
85 History, Philosophy, Psychology, Religion, and Sociology."
86 Display of the Ten Commandments with an appropriate context
87 statement is essential to the fulfillment of the mandate of
88 the State Board of Education in the education of students in
89 the areas of Civics, Government, History, Philosophy,
90 Religion, and Sociology.
91 (5) Two generations of Alabama students have attended
92 public schools in an era governed by the now-abandoned test
93 articulated in Lemon v. Kurtzman, 403 U.S. 602 (1971), for
94 compliance with the Establishment Clause of the United States
95 Constitution. Assuring restoration to the classroom of
96 historical truths surrounding the founding of our nation,
97 including those truths that "partake of the religious,"
98 Kennedy v. Bremerton, 597 U.S. 507, 535 (2022), is vital to
99 remedying the legal error of Lemon v. Kurtzman and to securing
100 a complete education of our students.
101 (6) Due to reliance on misinterpretations about the
102 meaning of the Establishment Clause or due to their own
103 personal policy preferences, a significant number of Alabama
104 teachers are unlikely to expose public school students to
105 these historical truths if left with any discretion about how
106 or whether to present these truths. Posting these historical
107 truths in classrooms and school common areas is thus an
108 essential means of accomplishing the state's educational
109 objectives in teaching students about the historical and
110 cultural significance of the Ten Commandments on the
111 development of the United States, as is apparent from
112 accompanying founding-era documents.
Page 4

accompanying founding-era documents.
SB99 Enrolled
113 (7) Including in the posting a reference to the state's
114 establishment clause and a recognition that "personal choice
115 about matters of faith are left to students and their
116 families" will further the state's interests in avoiding the
117 establishment or religion or interfering with the free
118 exercise of religion. Such disclaimers will also serve the
119 state's educational objectives because they will make it more
120 likely that classroom teachers will become comfortable
121 discussing the historical truths that are included in the
122 poster.
123 (8) This act does not create an unfunded mandate on any
124 public school governing authority. Local boards of education
125 are encouraged to use documents that are printed and made
126 available to the schools free of charge.
127 Section 2. (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, and subject
128 to the availability of donated funds or donated displays
129 pursuant to subsection (c) as determined by the State
130 Superintendent of Education, each local board of education
131 shall display a poster or framed document that meets the
132 requirements of subsection (b) in each of the following
133 locations:
134 (1) Every fifth through twelfth grade classroom where
135 United States history is routinely taught according to the
136 Alabama Course of Study.
137 (2) An entry way or other common area, such as the
138 cafeteria or school library, in every school within the
139 jurisdiction of the local board of education, except that this
140 subdivision shall not apply to any school that serves students
Page 5

subdivision shall not apply to any school that serves students
SB99 Enrolled
141 in kindergarten through fourth grade.
142 (b) The poster or framed document required by
143 subsection (a) shall meet each of the following requirements:
144 (1) The poster or framed document shall be at least 11
145 inches by 14 inches in size.
146 (2) The layout and design of the poster or framed
147 document shall be approved by the State Superintendent of
148 Education.
149 (3) The poster or framed document shall contain the
150 following content:
151 Historical Truths: The Ten Commandments and America's
152 Founding Documents
153 The Ten Commandments are a key part of the
154 Judeo-Christian religious and moral tradition that shaped
155 Western Civilization and ultimately the founding of the United
156 States. There are many versions of the Ten Commandments. The
157 one that follows is a common translation but not the only
158 translation.
159 You shall not have other gods before me
160 You shall not make idols
161 You shall not take the name of the Lord your God in
162 vain
163 Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy
164 Honor your father and your mother
165 You shall not murder
166 You shall not commit adultery
167 You shall not steal
168 You shall not bear false witness against your neighbor
Page 6

You shall not bear false witness against your neighbor
SB99 Enrolled
169 You shall not covet
170 In 1813, future U.S. President John Quincy Adams wrote
171 in a letter to his son that, "The Law given from Sinai" – in
172 other words, the Ten Commandments – "was a civil and municipal
173 as well as a moral and religious Code." He noted that many of
174 its provisions "were of universal applications – Laws
175 essential to the existence of men in Society, and most of
176 which have been enacted by every Nation which ever possessed
177 any Code of Law."
178 The Alabama Constitution provides that "no religion
179 shall be established by law," and the State of Alabama
180 specifically respects the rights of its public school students
181 to be free from state-established religion. Recognizing that
182 personal choice about matters of faith are left to students
183 and their families, the purpose of this poster is simply to
184 acknowledge the historical role of the Ten Commandments, and
185 the broader Judeo-Christian tradition, in shaping American
186 civil society.
187 The Mayflower Compact of 1620, America's first written
188 constitution, contained a "covenant with 'Almighty God'" by
189 pilgrims to America to "form a civil body politic."
190 The Northwest Ordinance of 1787 "extended the
191 fundamental principles of civil and religious liberty" to the
192 western territories becoming states and provided that
193 "[r]eligion, morality, and knowledge, being necessary to good
194 government and the happiness of mankind, schools and the means
195 of education shall forever be encouraged."
196 The Declaration of Independence (1776) described all
Page 7

The Declaration of Independence (1776) described all
SB99 Enrolled
197 men as being "created equal" and acknowledged that they are
198 "endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights."
199 The United States Constitution (1787) in its preamble
200 stated one of its purposes to be securing "the Blessings of
201 Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity."
202 From this tradition emerged the one nation under God
203 that we have inherited today.
204 (c) This section may not be construed to require a
205 local board of education to spend its funds to purchase the
206 displays required by this section. To fund the displays free
207 of charge, a local board of education may accept donated funds
208 to purchase the displays or may accept donated displays.
209 (d) The State Department of Education shall identify
210 appropriate resources for local boards of education to comply
211 with this section free of charge. Once identified, the
212 department shall list the free resources on the department's
213 website.
214 (e) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to
215 implement this section.
216 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
217 1, 2026.
Page 8

1, 2026.
SB99 Enrolled
218
219
220
221
222
223
224 ________________________________________________
225 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
226
227
228
229 ________________________________________________
230 Speaker of the House of Representatives
231
232
233 SB99
234 Senate 31-Mar-26
235 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
236 the Senate.
237
238 Patrick Harris,
239 Secretary.
240
241
242
243
244 House of Representatives
245 Passed: 09-Apr-26
246
247
248
249
250 By: Senator Kelley
Page 9